Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-559
Health care provider; provide informational materials; when.

A health care provider offering care to pregnant women may provide the informational materials published under section 71-558 to each pregnant woman during the first trimester of pregnancy or when a pregnant woman comes under the care of a provider after the first trimester of pregnancy.

Laws 2022, LB741, § 35.